Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 281, O.S.L.


2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 24-159), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 24-159. A. Each public school district shall maintain


a protocol for responding to students in mental health crisis with


the goal of preventing student suicide, self-harm, and harm to


others.


1. The protocol shall be developed, maintained, and implemented


in partnership with one or more local mental health treatment

Req. No. 3043 Page 1


providers certified by the Department of Mental Health and Substance


Abuse Services. At least one provider partner shall have:


a. the ability to serve all school-aged children


regardless of insurance status, and


b. the ability and certification to provide mental health


crisis services in the region where students attend


school.


2. Any organization certified by the state as a community


mental health center as defined in Section 3-302 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes or a Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic


shall serve as a school partner if requested by a school district


located in its state-designated service area.


B. The protocol for responding to mental health crises shall,


at a minimum:


1. Provide a definition of mental health crisis involving


potential for harm to self or others;


2. Document how mental health crises may be identified by


school administrators, teachers, support employees, and school-based


mental health professionals;


3. Outline nonpunitive steps to safeguard student health and


safety in response to an immediate or potential mental health


crisis;





Req. No. 3043 Page 2


4. Identify local treatment providers and resources available


to support students and families in mental health crisis and ensure


appropriate referrals to treatment;


5. Outline a process for ensuring parent and caregiver


notification and involvement during an actual or potential mental


health crisis; and


6. Document how student privacy will be protected in compliance


with applicable state and federal laws.


C. If a student who is under eighteen (18) years of age is


identified as being in or at risk of a mental health crisis, the


school district shall inform the parent or legal guardian of the


student and offer the treatment referral information contained in


the protocol. Parent or legal guardian consent shall be required


for any subsequent action taken by the school as part of the


protocol except in cases of immediate and life-threatening danger to


self or others.


D. All protocols developed by school districts and partner


organizations shall comply with the Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act (HIPAA) of 1996 (HIPAA) and Family Educational


Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA) privacy requirements.


E. School administrators, teachers, support employees, and


school-based mental health providers shall be provided ready access


to and regular training on the protocol.



Req. No. 3043 Page 3


F. A working agreement shall be signed by the school district


board of education and each identified mental health provider


partner outlining all obligations of the parties under the


established protocol and a strategy for regularly reviewing its


effectiveness using anonymous, nonidentifiable data.


G. Not less than every two (2) years, the school district and


its mental health provider partners shall jointly review the


protocol and working agreements and consider any updates necessary


to better meet the needs of students. School districts and mental


health provider partners shall include in their review process


information gathered from the Oklahoma Prevention Needs Assessment


Survey or an alternative survey, as provided for in Section 24-158


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


H. Each school district shall submit the latest protocol and


working agreements to the State Department of Education, which shall


share the protocols and agreements with the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services. These The agencies may require


revisions to ensure compliance with applicable laws, regulations,


and established evidence-based practices.


I. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services


and the State Department of Education shall provide technical


assistance to school districts and their provider partners by:


1. Making available an optional template protocol which


satisfies the provisions of this section;

Req. No. 3043 Page 4


2. Making available an optional template working agreement


which can be adopted by schools and provider partners;


3. Providing school districts with lists of local public and


private treatment providers eligible to serve as partners in the


development and maintenance of a protocol;


4. Providing information on any available mental health crisis


phone line;


5. Making available information on evidence-based practices for


meeting the mental health needs of students; and


6. Providing ongoing assistance and consultation as requested


by a school district.


J. The Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services and


the State Board of Education may promulgate rules as necessary to


ensure compliance with this section.


K. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create,


establish, expand, reduce, contract, or eliminate any civil


liability on the part of any school or school employee.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 24-158, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 281, O.S.L. 2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 24-158), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 3043 Page 5


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3043 EB 1/15/2026 8:32:27 AM









































Req. No. 3043 Page 6